Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1705
Sections; how construed.

Sections 70-1701 to 70-1705 shall be liberally construed to effectuate their purposes. The provisions of sections 70-1701 to 70-1705 shall be independent of and supplemental to any other applicable provisions of law, petition for creation, or charter.

Laws 2004, LB 969, § 5.